Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 2
VACANCIES IN OFFICE

1-12-201. Vacancies in office of United States senator.

When a vacancy occurs in the office of United States senator from this state, the governor shall make a temporary appointment to fill the vacancy until it is filled by election.

When a vacancy occurs, the governor shall direct the secretary of state to include in the general election notice for the next general election a notice of the filling of the vacancy. The secretary of state shall give notice accordingly. At the election, the vacancy shall be filled for the unexpired term. If, for any reason, no United States senator is elected at the next general election, the person temporarily appointed by the governor shall hold the office until a United States senator is elected at a succeeding general election.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 799, § 15, effective January 1, 1993.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-12-101 as it existed prior to 1992.

1-12-202. Vacancies in office of representative in congress.

Except as provided in section 1-4-401.5, when any vacancy occurs in the office of representative in congress from this state, the governor shall set a day to hold a congressional vacancy election to fill the vacancy and cause notice of the election to be given as required in part 2 of article 5 of this title; but congressional vacancy elections shall not be held within the ninety-day period preceding a general election.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 800, § 15, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 410, § 5, effective August 5.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-12-102 as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

For registration for congressional vacancy elections, see § 1-2-210; for power of the county central committee to fill vacancies, see § 1-3-104.

1-12-203. Vacancies in general assembly.

In the event of a vacancy in the general assembly caused by the death or resignation of a member who has been sworn into office, caused by the death or resignation of a member who has been elected to a seat but who has not yet been sworn into office, or caused by a person not taking the oath of office as provided in paragraph (b) of subsection (3) of this section, the vacancy shall be filled by the appropriate vacancy committee, if any, as provided in section 1-3-103 (1)(d), of the same political party and of the same representative or senatorial district represented by the former member whose seat is vacant. If the member was affiliated with a minor political party, then the vacancy shall be filled by the vacancy committee designated in the constitution or bylaws of the minor political party. If the member was unaffiliated with a political party, then the vacancy shall be filled by the vacancy committee designated on the petition for nomination pursuant to section 1-4-802 (1)(e). The vacancy shall be filled until the next general election after the vacancy occurs, when the vacancy shall be filled by election.

No vacancy committee may select a person to fill a vacancy at a meeting held pursuant to this section unless a written notice announcing the time and location of the vacancy committee meeting was mailed to each of the committee members at least ten days prior to the meeting by the chairperson of the central committee that selected the members. Mailing of the notice is effective when the notice is properly addressed and deposited in the United States mail, with first-class postage prepaid.

The vacancy committee, by a majority vote of its members present and voting at a meeting called for that purpose and open to the public, shall select a person who possesses the constitutional qualifications for a member of the general assembly and who is affiliated with the same political party or minor political party, if any, shown in the statewide voter registration system as the former member whose seat is vacant. No vacancy committee meeting shall be held until a quorum is present consisting of not less than one-half of the voting membership of the vacancy committee. No member of the vacancy committee may vote by proxy. The committee shall certify the selection to the secretary of state within thirty days from the date the vacancy occurs; except that, in the case of a vacancy filled pursuant to section 1-4-1006, the committee shall certify the selection within thirty days after the date of the general election affected by the vacancy. If the vacancy committee fails to certify a selection within thirty days in accordance with this subsection (3), the governor, within five days, shall fill the vacancy by appointing a person having the qualifications set forth in this subsection (3). The name of the person selected or appointed must be certified to the secretary of state.

No sooner than two days after receiving the certification from the vacancy committee, the secretary of state shall certify the name of the person selected or appointed to the appropriate house of the general assembly. The oath of office shall be administered to the person within thirty days of the receipt of such certification by the appropriate house or on the convening date of the general assembly, whichever occurs first; except that the president of the senate or the speaker of the house of representatives, as appropriate, shall extend the time to take the oath upon a finding that extenuating circumstances prevented the person from taking the oath within the initial thirty-day period. In the event the person does not take the oath of office in accordance with this paragraph (b), the office shall be deemed vacant and shall be filled by the appropriate vacancy committee pursuant to the provisions of this section. The person, after having qualified and taken the oath of office, shall immediately assume the duties of office and shall serve until the next convening of the general assembly following the election certification and qualification of a successor. Nothing in this subsection (3) shall be construed to reduce the number of consecutive terms that a person appointed to fill a vacancy in the general assembly may serve in accordance with section 3 of article V of the state constitution.

For purposes of this section, a vacancy caused by the resignation of a member of the general assembly occurs on the effective date of the member's letter of resignation to the chief clerk of the house of representatives or the secretary of the senate. If the letter of resignation gives an effective date of resignation that is later than the date the letter of resignation is submitted, the vacancy committee may meet no more than twenty days prior to the effective date of the resignation for the purposes of nominating a person to fill the vacancy. The certification of the nominee of the vacancy committee to the secretary of state may not be made prior to the effective date of the resignation; further, should the member of the general assembly withdraw the letter of resignation prior to the effective date, the person nominated by the vacancy committee may not be certified to the secretary of state.

If the vacancy is caused by the death of a member-elect of the general assembly who has been elected to office but who has not yet been sworn in, the vacancy committee shall meet no more than thirty days after the death of the general assembly member-elect to fill the vacancy. The certification of the nomination of the vacancy committee to the secretary of state may be made prior to the convening of the general assembly but shall not take effect until the effective date of the vacancy, which is the first day the general assembly convenes.

Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, a member of a vacancy committee filling a vacancy pursuant to this section may participate in a vacancy committee meeting remotely, including casting the member's vote by e-mail, mail, telephone, or through an internet-based application if allowed by the party's rules.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 800, § 15, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 95:

(1) and (3) amended and (4) and (5) added, p. 851, § 80, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(1) and (3) amended, p. 260, § 15, effective April 13; (3) amended, p. 812, § 2, effective May 26.

L. 99:

(3) amended, p. 934, § 4, effective August 4.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 1745, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2016:

(3)(a) amended, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 587, § 66, effective May 18.

L. 2017:

(3)(a) amended, (SB 17-209), ch. 234, p. 963, § 10, effective August 9.

L. 2021:

(6) added, (HB 21-1001), ch. 1, p. 2, § 3, effective January 20; (6)(b) repealed, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1667, § 66, effective June 21.

1-12-204. Vacancies in state and district offices.

All vacancies in any state office and in the office of district attorney shall be filled by appointment by the governor until the next general election after the vacancy occurs, when the vacancy shall be filled by election.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 801, § 15, effective January 1, 1993.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-12-104 as it existed prior to 1992.

1-12-205. Vacancies in county offices.

All vacancies in any county office, except that of county commissioner, shall be filled by appointment by the board of county commissioners of the county in which the vacancy occurs, until the next general election, at which time the vacancy shall be filled by election.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 801, § 15, effective January 1, 1993.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-12-105 as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

For determination of existence of vacancy in county offices, see § 30-10-105.

1-12-206. Vacancies in the office of county commissioner.

In case of a vacancy occurring in the office of county commissioner, a vacancy committee constituted as provided in this section shall, by a majority vote of its members present at a meeting called for the purpose, fill the vacancy by appointment within ten days after the occurrence of the vacancy. The meeting shall not be held unless a quorum is present consisting of not less than one-half of the voting members of the vacancy committee. A member of the vacancy committee may not vote by proxy. If the vacancy committee fails to fill the vacancy within ten days, the governor shall fill the vacancy by appointment within fifteen days after the occurrence of the vacancy.

If the vacating commissioner was elected by the electors of the whole county, whether at large or from a district, the successor shall be appointed by a vacancy committee constituted of those persons selected at the county central committee organizational meeting of the same political party as the vacating commissioner. In selecting the members of a vacancy committee, the central committee of a jurisdiction shall select, at a minimum, the members of the jurisdiction's central committee.

If the vacating commissioner was elected only by the electors of the district from which the vacating commissioner was elected, the county commissioner district central committee of the same district and political party as the vacating commissioner shall appoint a vacancy committee whose sole purpose shall be to name a successor to the position of county commissioner. In selecting the members of a vacancy committee, the central committee of a jurisdiction shall select, at a minimum, the members of the jurisdiction's central committee. In the event the county commissioner district central committee fails to appoint a vacancy committee, the vacancy committee shall consist of the members of the jurisdiction's central committee.

If the vacating commissioner is unaffiliated, then a registered unaffiliated successor shall be appointed by the governor, acting as a vacancy committee, within ten days after the vacancy.

(4.5) If the vacating commissioner is affiliated with a minor political party, then a registered elector affiliated with the same minor political party shall be appointed as the successor pursuant to the constitution or bylaws of the minor political party.

Any person appointed to a vacancy in the office of county commissioner under this section must be a resident of the county and reside within the district, if any, in which the vacancy exists and must be a member of the same political party or minor political party, if any, shown in the statewide voter registration system as the vacating commissioner. Any person appointed pursuant to this section holds the office until the next general election or until the vacancy is filled by election according to law.

A vacancy committee may not select a person to fill a vacancy at a meeting held pursuant to this section unless a written notice announcing the time and location of the vacancy committee meeting is mailed to each member of the vacancy committee at least six days before the meeting by the chairperson of the central committee. Mailing of the notice is effective when the notice is properly addressed and deposited in the United States mail with first-class postage prepaid.

Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, a member of a vacancy committee filling a vacancy pursuant to this section may participate in a vacancy committee meeting remotely, including casting the member's vote by e-mail, mail, telephone, or through an internet-based application if allowed by the party's rules.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 801, § 15, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 98:

(4.5) added and (5) amended, p. 260, § 16, effective April 13.

L. 2008:

(1) amended and (6) added, p. 1747, § 2, effective August 5.

L. 2016:

(5) amended, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 588, § 67, effective May 18.

L. 2021:

(7) added, (HB 21-1001), ch. 1, p. 2, § 4, effective January 20; (7)(b) repealed, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1667, § 67, effective June 21.

L. 2022:

(2) and (3) amended, (HB 22-1044), ch. 83, p. 403, § 2, effective August 10.

1-12-207. Vacancies on nonpartisan boards.

Any vacancy on a nonpartisan board shall be filled by appointment by the remaining director or directors. The appointee shall meet all of the qualifications for holding the office. The appointee shall serve until the next regular election, at which time any remaining unexpired portion of the term shall be filled by election. If the board fails, neglects, or refuses to fill any vacancy within sixty days after it occurs, the board of county commissioners of the county in which the organizational petition is filed shall fill the vacancy.

If there are no duly elected directors and if the failure to appoint a new board will result in the interruption of services that are being provided by the district, then the board of county commissioners of the county in which the organizational petition is filed may appoint all directors. Any board appointed pursuant to this subsection (2) shall call a special election within six months after its appointment.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 802, § 15, effective January 1, 1993.

1-12-208. Unexpired terms less than ninety days.

No person shall be elected to fill a vacancy in an elective office when the unexpired term is, at the time of the election, less than ninety days. In such case, the person appointed to fill the vacancy shall continue to hold the office for the remainder of the unexpired term and until the successor elected at the election is duly qualified.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 802, § 15, effective January 1, 1993.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-12-107 as it existed prior to 1992.

1-12-209. Terms of persons filling vacancies.

Except for appointments on nonpartisan boards, any officers elected or appointed to fill vacancies as provided in this article shall qualify and enter upon the duties of their offices immediately thereafter. If elected or appointed, the officers shall hold the office during the unexpired term for which they were elected and until their successors are elected, qualified, and take office on the second Tuesday of January, except as otherwise provided by law, in accordance with section 1-1-201.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 802, § 15, effective January 1, 1993.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-12-108 as it existed prior to 1992.

1-12-210. Certification of appointment.

All appointments under this article shall be evidenced by an appropriate entry in the minutes of the meeting of the governing board, and the appointing body shall cause a notice of appointment and the oath of office to be delivered to the person appointed. A duplicate of each notice of appointment, an acceptance of appointment, and the mailing address of the person appointed shall be kept as a permanent record by the appointing body and forwarded to any other appropriate official.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 803, § 15, effective January 1, 1993.